Utah statutes.
20A-5-103.   Constitutional amendments -- Posting.

(1)  Whenever a constitutional amendment is submitted to a vote of the people for their approval or rejection, the county clerk shall:

(a)  cause the original section of the constitution to be printed on cards in large clear type with the changes to it indicated by bracketing and interlining any language proposed to be repealed and underlining any new language proposed to be inserted; and

(b)  place the question as it appears upon the official ballot after the original section.

(2)  If there is more than one amendment submitted, the clerk shall ensure that the proposed amendments are placed upon the cards in columns in the same order as they will appear upon the official ballot.

(3)  Each county clerk shall:

(a)  provide the election judges for each voting precinct with two constitutional amendment cards; and

(b)  direct the election judges to post the two constitutional amendment cards in and about the polling place.



Amended by Chapter 183, 1997 General Session

